Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
432D

HEALTH
MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATION ACT

Section

432D-1 Definitions

432D-1.5 Bona fide trade associations

432D-2 Establishment of health maintenance
organizations

432D-3 Powers of health maintenance
organizations

432D-4 Fiduciary responsibilities

432D-5 Annual and quarterly reports

432D-6 Information to enrollees or subscribers

432D-7 Investments

432D-8 Protection against insolvency

432D-9 Uncovered expenditures insolvency deposit

432D-9.5 Reserve credit for reinsurance

432D-10 Enrollment period

432D-11 Replacement coverage

432D-12 Powers of insurers and hospital and
medical service

corporations

432D-13 Examinations

432D-14 Suspension, revocation, or denial of
certificate of

authority

432D-15 Rehabilitation, liquidation, or
conservation of health

maintenance organizations

432D-16 Summary orders and supervision

432D-17 Fees

432D-18 Penalties and enforcement

432D-18.5 Repealed

432D-19 Statutory construction and relationship
to other laws

432D-20 Filings and reports as public documents

432D-21 Confidentiality of medical information

432D-22 Acquisition of control of or merger of a
health

maintenance organization

432D-23 Required provisions and benefits

432D-23.5 Coverage for telehealth

432D-23.6 Federally funded programs; exemption

432D-24 Coordination of benefits

432D-25 Disclosure of health care coverage and
benefits

432D-26 Genetic information nondiscrimination in
health

insurance coverage

432D-26.3 Nondiscrimination on the basis of actual
gender

identity or perceived gender identity;
coverage for

services

432D-27 Policies relating to domestic abuse cases

432D-28 Federal law compliance

432D-29 Prohibition on rescissions of coverage

Cross References

Assessments of health insurers, see §431:2-216.

Conformance to federal law, see §431:2-201.5.

Health care provider network adequacy, see chapter 432F.

Peer review, see §663-1.7.

Prescription drug benefits, see chapter 431R.

Prescription drugs; mail order opt out option, see §87A-16.3.

Attorney General Opinions

Section 431:10A-601 applied only to insurers, and not mutual
benefit societies or health maintenance organizations. Att. Gen. Op. 97-5.

Case Notes

As this chapter does not cover the field of managed care
regulation and because §§432D-2, 432E-1, and article 431:10A can be read
together and there is no explicit language or policy reason not to give each
statute effect, this chapter does not repeal chapter 432E by implication. 126
H. 326, 271 P.3d 621 (2012).

Properly licensed HMOs, like plaintiff, were authorized
pursuant to §432D-1 to "provide or arrange", at their option, for the
closed panel health care services required under the managed care plan program;
accident and health insurers were authorized under §431:10A-205(b) to arrange
for medical services for members using a defined network of providers, i.e.,
particular "hospitals or persons"; thus, article 431:10A and this
chapter authorized both accident and health insurers and HMOs, as risk-bearing
entities, to provide the closed panel product required by the managed care plan
contracts. 126 H. 326, 271 P.3d 621 (2012).

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next